apertium-hbs.hbs.metadix
    <pardef n="Dra/ga__n"><!--With sibilarization-->
      <e><p><l>ga</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ge</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gu</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>zi</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>zi</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>go</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ga</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gom</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ge</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ga</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ge</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gama</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gama</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ge</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gama</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Li/ka__n"><!--With and without sibilarization-->
      <e><p><l>ka</l><r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ke</l><r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ku</l><r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ci</l><r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ki</l><r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ci</l><r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ki</l><r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ko</l><r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ka</l><r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kom</l><r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ke</l><r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ka</l><r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ke</l><r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kama</l><r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kama</l><r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ke</l><r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kama</l><r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Pože/ga__n"><!--With and without sibilarization-->
      <e><p><l>ga</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ge</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gu</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>zi</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>gi</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>zi</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>gi</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>go</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gom</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ge</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ga</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ge</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gama</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gama</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ge</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gama</l><r>ga<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!--end Toponyms-->
    <!--Abbreviations-->

    <pardef n="NATO__abbr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="abbr"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-a</l><r><s n="abbr"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-e</l><r><s n="abbr"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-u</l><r><s n="abbr"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-u</l><r><s n="abbr"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-e</l><r><s n="abbr"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-om</l><r><s n="abbr"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ETA__abbr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="abbr"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-e</l><r><s n="abbr"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-u</l><r><s n="abbr"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-i</l><r><s n="abbr"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-i</l><r><s n="abbr"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-o</l><r><s n="abbr"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-om</l><r><s n="abbr"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="Eft/a__abbr">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="abbr"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>a<s n="abbr"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>a<s n="abbr"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>a<s n="abbr"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>a<s n="abbr"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>a<s n="abbr"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>om</l><r>a<s n="abbr"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="EFTA__abbr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="abbr"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-e</l><r><s n="abbr"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-u</l><r><s n="abbr"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-i</l><r><s n="abbr"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-i</l><r><s n="abbr"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-o</l><r><s n="abbr"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-om</l><r><s n="abbr"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ALTEA"><i>ALTEA</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="EUFOR"><i>EUFOR</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="SEWRC"><i>SEWRC</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ISAF"><i>ISAF</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="SAA"><i>SAA</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="NATO"><i>NATO</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="UN"><i>UN</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="SAD"><i>SAD</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="UNMIK"><i>UNMIK</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="KNPVP"><i>KNPVP</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="OPP"><i>OPP</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="NACE"><i>NACE</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="ERS"><i>ERS</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="MRS"><i>MRS</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="IKT"><i>IKT</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="http"><i>http</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="UL"><i>UL</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="EGP"><i>EGP</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="EGS"><i>EGS</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="TSI"><i>TSI</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="CAS"><i>CAS</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="EFSA"><i>EFSA</i><par n="EFTA__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="KN"><i>KN</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="COM"><i>COM</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="EESO"><i>EESO</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="OP"><i>OP</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="X"><i>X</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="T"><i>X</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="LRK"><i>LRK</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="TSI"><i>LRK</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="Efta"><i>Eft</i><par n="Eft/a__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="SZVP"><i>SZVP</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="ISO"><i>ISO</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="PDEU"><i>PDEU</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="GD"><i>GD</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="ESMA"><i>ESMA</i><par n="EFTA__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="EES"><i>EES</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="EKJS"><i>EKJS</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="ESPJ"><i>ESPJ</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="PPEU"><i>PPEU</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="CE"><i>CE</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="GATT"><i>GATT</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="VIS"><i>VIS</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="EKSRP"><i>EKSRP</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="UAIS"><i>UAIS</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="AIS"><i>AIS</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="ESS"><i>ESS</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="ČDO"><i>ČDO</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="SEC"><i>SEC</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="HS"><i>HS</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="PH"><i>PH</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="OLAF">			 <i>OLAF</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="MDS"><i>MDS</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="OVSE"><i>OVSE</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="USD"><i>USD</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="ECB"><i>ECB</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="SIS"><i>SIS</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="ECR"><i>ECR</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="IND">			 <i>IND</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="DEM">			 <i>DEM</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="BG">				 <i>BG</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="UEN">			 <i>UEN</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="EUR"><i>EUR</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="FR"><i>FR</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="PL"><i>PL</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="PT"><i>PT</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ES"><i>ES</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="EL"><i>EL</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="CO"><i>CO</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="PPE"><i>PPE</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="NL"><i>NL</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="ZN"><i>ZN</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="RO"><i>RO</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="SV"><i>SV</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="HU"><i>HU</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="SK"><i>SK</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="ALDE"><i>ALDE</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="SKP"><i>SKP</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="CS"><i>CS</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="BDP"><i>BDP</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="MSP"><i>MSP</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="EP"><i>EP</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="LT"><i>LT</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="C"><i>C</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="ALE"><i>ALE</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="PDV"><i>PDV</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="AKP"><i>AKP</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="ESPG"><i>ESPG</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="EIB"><i>EIB</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="FI"><i>FI</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="GUE"><i>GUE</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="NGL"><i>NGL</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="IMO"><i>IMO</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="SUT"><i>SUT</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="PNZ"><i>PNZ</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="OECD"><i>OECD</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="NCB"><i>NCB</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="CPA"><i>CPA</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="ICES"><i>ICES</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="MSRP"><i>MSRP</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
	<e lm="TGO"><i>TGO</i><par n="NATO__abbr"/></e>
